Utah statutes.
7-14-1.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Depository institution" means any institution authorized by state or
federal law to accept and hold demand deposits or other accounts which may be
used to effect third party payment transactions. The definition of "depository
institution" in Chapter 1 does not apply to Chapter  14.
(2)  "Credit reporting agency" includes any co-operative credit reporting
agency maintained by an association of financial institutions or one or more
associations of merchants.
